Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1206.04
Emergency care provider, defined.

Emergency care provider includes all licensure classifications of emergency care providers established pursuant to the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act. Prior to December 31, 2025, emergency care provider includes advanced emergency medical technician, community paramedic, critical care paramedic, emergency medical responder, emergency medical technician, emergency medical technician-intermediate, and paramedic. On and after December 31, 2025, emergency care provider includes advanced emergency medical technician, community paramedic, critical care paramedic, emergency medical responder, emergency medical technician, and paramedic.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 492;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 15;

R.S.Supp.,2018, § 38-1208;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 18.